es: Sistema de bordona del cajón flamenco: Sistema dual (cuerdas + bordones); Cuerdas de guitarra (tensión ajustable); Cuerdas de guitarra (fijas); Sin bordones (estilo tradicional/peruano); Bordones; Otro
fi: Flamenco-cajonin virvelikoneisto: Kaksoisjärjestelmä (kielet ja matto); Kitarankielet (säädettävä kireys); Kitarankielet (kiinteä); Ei virvelijärjestelmää (perinteinen/perulainen tyyli); Virvelimatto; Muu
ru: Система струн фламенко-кахона: Двойная система (струны и пружины); Гитарные струны (регулируемое натяжение); Гитарные струны (фиксированные); Без подструнника (традиционный/перуанский стиль); Пружины для малого барабана; Другое
tr: Flamenko cajon trampet sistemi: Çift sistem (teller + tel sargılar); Gitar telleri (ayarlanabilir gerginlik); Gitar telleri (sabit); Trampet teli yok (geleneksel/Peru stili); Trampet telleri; Diğer
nl: Flamenco cajon snare systeem: Dubbel systeem (snaren + draden); Gitaarsnaren (verstelbare spanning); Gitaarsnaren (vast); Geen snare (traditionele/Peruaanse stijl); Snaredraden; Overige
sv: Virveltrumsystem för flamenco cajon: Dubbelt system (strängar + vajrar); Gitarrsträngar (justerbar spänning); Gitarrsträngar (fasta); Ingen sejare (traditionell/peruansk stil); Sejartrådar; Övrigt
lt-LT: Flamenko kajono būgnelio sistema: Dviguba sistema (stygos ir spyruoklės); Gitaros stygos (reguliuojamas įtempimas); Gitaros stygos (fiksuotos); Be spyruoklių (tradicinis / Peru stilius); Spyruoklės; Kita
th: ระบบกลองสแนร์คาฮอนฟลาเมงโก: ระบบคู่ (สายกีตาร์ + สายสแนร์); สายกีตาร์ (ปรับความตึงได้); สายกีตาร์ (แบบตายตัว); ไม่มีสแนร์ (สไตล์ดั้งเดิม/เปรู); สายสแนร์; อื่นๆ
da: Flamenco cajon-snaresystem: Dobbelt system (strenge + seiding); Guitarstrenge (justerbar spænding); Guitarstrenge (faste); Uden seiding (traditionel/peruviansk stil); Seiding; Andet
hr-HR: Sustav za zamku flamenko kutije: Dvostruki sustav (žice + opruge); Žice za gitaru (podesiva napetost); Žice za gitaru (fiksne); Bez mrežice (tradicionalni/peruanski stil); Mrežica; Ostalo
bg-BG: Тип система за снара при фламенко кахон: Двойна система (струни + пружини); Китарни струни (регулируемо напрежение); Китарни струни (фиксирани); Без пружини (традиционен / перуански стил); Пружини за соло барабан; Друго
it: Sistema di rullante cajon flamenco: Sistema doppio (corde + fili); Corde di chitarra (tensione regolabile); Corde di chitarra (fisse); Senza cordiera (stile tradizionale/peruviano); Fili della cordiera; Altro
hu: Flamenco cajon pergőrendszer: Kettős rendszer (húrok és sodronyok); Gitárhúrok (állítható feszességű); Gitárhúrok (rögzített); Sodrony nélküli (hagyományos / perui stílus); Sodronyok; Egyéb
zh-CN: 弗拉门戈卡洪鼓响弦系统: 双系统（琴弦 + 响弦）; 吉他琴弦（张力可调）; 吉他琴弦（固定）; 无响弦（传统/秘鲁风格）; 响弦; 其他
zh-TW: 弗拉門戈卡洪鼓響弦系統: 雙系統 (響弦 + 響線); 吉他弦 (張力可調); 吉他弦 (固定); 無響線 (傳統 / 秘魯風格); 小鼓響線; 其他
cs: Strunění u flamencového cajonu: Duální systém (struny + dráty); Kytarové struny (nastavitelné napětí); Kytarové struny (pevné); Bez struníku (tradiční/peruánský styl); Struník; Jiné
en: Flamenco cajon snare system: Dual system (strings + wires); Guitar strings (adjustable tension); Guitar strings (fixed); No snare (traditional/peruvian style); Snare wires; Other
pl: System werblowy cajon flamenco: System podwójny (struny i sprężyny); Struny gitarowe (z regulacją naciągu); Struny gitarowe (stałe); Bez sprężyn (styl tradycyjny/peruwiański); Sprężyny werblowe; Inny
pt-PT: sistema de caixa de cajón flamenco: Sistema duplo (cordas + bordões); Cordas de guitarra (tensão ajustável); Cordas de guitarra (fixas); Sem bordões (estilo tradicional/peruano); Bordões; Outro
el: Σύστημα ταμπούρου cajón flamenco: Διπλό σύστημα (χορδές + σύρματα); Χορδές κιθάρας (ρυθμιζόμενης τάσης); Χορδές κιθάρας (σταθερές); Χωρίς χορδιέρα (παραδοσιακό/περουβιανό στιλ); Σύρματα χορδιέρας; Άλλο
de: Schnarrsystem der Flamenco-Cajón: Dualsystem (Saiten & Spiralen); Gitarrensaiten (verstellbare Spannung); Gitarrensaiten (fixiert); Keine Snare (traditionell/peruanischer Stil); Snare-Teppiche; Sonstige
pt-BR: Sistema de caixa de cajón flamenco: Sistema duplo (cordas + esteira); Cordas de violão (tensão ajustável); Cordas de violão (fixas); Sem esteira (estilo tradicional/peruano); Fios de esteira; Outros
vi: Hệ thống dây snare trống cajon Flamenco: Hệ thống kép (dây đàn + dây tem); Dây đàn guitar (chỉnh được lực căng); Dây đàn guitar (cố định); Không có dây tem (kiểu truyền thống/Peru); Dây tem; Khác
sk-SK: Systém strunníka cajonu pre flamenco: Dvojitý systém (struny a strunník); Gitarové struny (nastaviteľné napätie); Gitarové struny (pevné); Bez strunníka (tradičný/peruánsky štýl); Strunník; Iné
ro-RO: Sistem de cajon snare flamenco: Sistem dual (corzi + arcuri); Corzi de chitară (tensiune reglabilă); Corzi de chitară (fixe); Fără premier (stil tradițional/peruvian); Arcuri premier; Altele
ja: フラメンコカホンスネアシステム: デュアルシステム (ストリングス + ワイヤー); ギターストリングス (張力調整可能); ギターストリングス (固定); スネアなし (トラディショナル/ペルー風); スネアワイヤー; その他
nb: Flamenco cajon skarptrommesystem: Dobbelt system (strenger og seidetråder); Gitarstrenger (justerbar stramming); Gitarstrenger (faste); Uten seider (tradisjonell/peruansk stil); Seidetråder; Annet
fr: Système de timbre du cajón flamenco: Double système (cordes + timbres); Cordes de guitare (tension réglable); Cordes de guitare (fixes); Sans timbre (style traditionnel/péruvien); Timbres; Autre
ko: 플라멩코 카혼 스네어 시스템: 이중 시스템(스트링 및 와이어); 기타 스트링(장력 조절형); 기타 스트링(고정형); 스네어 없음(전통/페루식); 스네어 와이어; 기타
sl-SI: Sistem strun za flamenko kahon: Dvojni sistem (strune in žice); Kitarske strune (nastavljiva napetost); Kitarske strune (fiksne); Brez mrežice (tradicionalni/perujski slog); Mrežica; Drugo